Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB741.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2709.2. Unauthorized use of electronic tracking device.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of unauthorized use of an electronic tracking device when the person installs or places an electronic tracking device without consent, or causes an electronic tracking device to be installed or placed on the person or property of another person without consent, and uses the electronic tracking device to track the location or movement of the other person within this Commonwealth.(b) Exceptions.--The provisions of this section shall not 1234567891011121314151617 apply to the installation, placement or use of an electronic tracking device by:(1) Unless prohibited by court order, the parent or legal guardian of a minor when tracking:(i) The minor.(ii) A person authorized by the parent or legal guardian as a caretaker of the minor at any time when the minor is under the caretaker's sole care.(2) A legally authorized guardian of an incapacitated person as defined in 20 Pa.C.S. § 5902 (relating to definitions).(3) A caregiver or family member of a senior citizen or adult with a disability, if a physician of the senior citizen or adult with a disability recommends the installation of a tracking device or tracking application to ensure the safety of the elderly person or disabled adult.(4) An investigative officer, law enforcement officer or agency while conducting an investigation, when the officer or agency is engaged in the lawful performance of official duties and is otherwise acting in accordance with other Federal and State laws.(5) A law enforcement officer pursuant to a court order or as a condition of supervision for a pretrial diversionary program, probation or parole.(c) Applicability.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to any of the following who has obtained informed consent for the placement of an electronic tracking device and is acting in good faith furthering a business interest:(1) An owner, lessee or contractor of fleet vehicles.20250SB0741PN0802 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) An electronic communications provider.(3) A business entity.(d) Grading.--(1) A first offense under this section constitutes a misdemeanor of the second degree.(2) The following offenses shall constitute a misdemeanor of the first degree:(i) A second or subsequent offense under this section.(ii) Any offense in which the offender is subject to a protection order issued under:(A) 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108 (relating to relief) regarding the victim; or(B) a condition of bail imposed in a separate pending matter.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Electronic tracking device." An electronic or mechanical device that permits an individual to remotely determine or track the position and movement of another individual or the property of another individual."Fleet vehicle." One or more motor vehicles:(1) owned, leased or contracted by any of the following for business or government purposes:(i) An entity.(ii) An employee of the entity.(iii) An agent of the entity.(iv) An individual authorized to operate the fleet vehicle in compliance with a contract between the entity 20250SB0741PN0802 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and another party;(2) held for lease or rental to the general public; or(3) held for sale by a motor vehicle dealer.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0741PN0802 - 4 - 1234